Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 1
TRAFFIC REGULATION - GENERALLY

42-4-101. Short title.

Parts 1 to 3, 5 to 19, and 21 of this article, part 1 of article 2 of this title, and part 5 of article 5 of title 43, C.R.S., shall be known and may be cited as the "Uniform Safety Code of 1935".

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2227, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 485, § 5, effective July 1.

42-4-102. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly recognizes the many conflicts which presently exist between the state's traffic laws and many of the municipal traffic codes, which conflicts lead to uncertainty in the movement of traffic on the state's highways and streets. These conflicts are compounded by the fact that today's Americans are extremely mobile and that while this state enjoys a large influx of traffic from many areas, there is some lack of uniformity existing between the "rules of the road" of this state and those of other states of the nation. The general assembly, therefore, declares it the purpose of this article to alleviate these conflicts and lack of uniformity by conforming, as nearly as possible, certain of the traffic laws of this state with the recommendations of the national committee of uniform traffic laws and ordinances as set forth in the committee's "Uniform Vehicle Code".

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2227, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

42-4-103. Scope and effect of article - exceptions to provisions.

This article constitutes the uniform traffic code throughout the state and in all political subdivisions and municipalities therein.

The provisions of this article relating to the operation of vehicles and the movement of pedestrians refer exclusively to the use of streets and highways except:

Where a different place is specifically referred to in a given section;

For provisions of sections 42-2-128, 42-4-1301 to 42-4-1303, 42-4-1401, 42-4-1402, and 42-4-1413 and part 16 of this article which shall apply upon streets and highways and elsewhere throughout the state.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2228, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2007:

(1) amended, p. 31, § 6, effective August 3.

42-4-104. Adoption of traffic control manual.

The department of transportation shall adopt a manual and specifications for a uniform system of traffic control devices consistent with the provisions of this article for use upon highways within this state. Such uniform system shall correlate with and insofar as possible conform to the system set forth in the most recent edition of the "Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices for Streets and Highways" and other related standards issued or endorsed by the federal highway administrator. For compliance with this section, the said department shall either publish and distribute a state manual and specifications approved by the transportation commission or shall, by the issuance of a traffic control manual supplement approved by the transportation commission, adopt the said national manual and other related standards subject to such exceptions, additions, and adaptations as are necessary for lawful and uniform application in this state. Said state manual or supplement shall be made available to all municipal and county road authorities and to other concerned agencies in the state.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2228, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-501 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-4-105. Local traffic control devices.

Local authorities in their respective jurisdictions shall place and maintain such traffic control devices upon highways under their jurisdiction as they may deem necessary to indicate and to carry out the provisions of this article or local traffic ordinances or to regulate, warn, or guide traffic, subject in the case of state highways to the provisions of sections 42-4-110 and 43-2-135 (1)(g), C.R.S. All such traffic control devices shall conform to the state manual and specifications for statewide uniformity as provided in section 42-4-104.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2228, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-503 (1) as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-105 was relocated to § 42-4-107.

42-4-106. Who may restrict right to use highways - definitions - rules - repeal.

Local authorities with respect to highways under their jurisdiction may by ordinance or resolution prohibit the operation of vehicles upon any such highway or impose restrictions as to the weight of vehicles to be operated upon any such highway, for a total period of not to exceed ninety days in any one calendar year, whenever any said highway by reason of deterioration, rain, snow, or other climatic conditions will be seriously damaged or destroyed unless the use of vehicles thereon is prohibited or the permissible weights thereof reduced.

The local authority enacting any such ordinance or resolution shall erect or cause to be erected and maintained signs designating the permissible weights.

Local authorities, with respect to highways under their jurisdiction, may also, by ordinance or resolution, prohibit the operation of trucks or commercial vehicles on designated highways or may impose limitations as to the weight thereof, which prohibitions and limitations shall be designated by appropriate signs placed on such highways.

The department of transportation shall likewise have authority as granted in this section to local authorities to determine by resolution and to impose restrictions as to the weight of vehicles operated upon any highway under the jurisdiction of said department, and such restrictions shall be effective when signs giving notice thereof are erected upon the highways or portion of any highway affected by such resolution.

(4.5) (a) The department of transportation has authority to close any portion of a state highway to public travel.

A person who operates a motor vehicle or vehicle combination over thirty-five feet in length on state highway 82 between mile markers 47 and 72 in violation of a closure under paragraph (a) of this subsection (4.5) is subject to an enhanced penalty as set forth in section 42-4-1701 (4)(a)(I)(F).

A person who operates a motor vehicle or vehicle combination over thirty-five feet in length on state highway 82 between mile markers 47 and 72 in violation of a closure under paragraph (a) of this subsection (4.5), where the result of the violation is an incident that causes the closure of a travel lane in one or both directions, is subject to an enhanced penalty as set forth in section 42-4-1701 (4)(a)(I)(F).

Repealed.

The department of transportation may close any portion of a state highway for public use during dangerous driving conditions, during construction or maintenance operations, or when necessary for the protection and safety of the public.

When icy or snow-packed conditions exist on the highway, the department of transportation may restrict travel on or use of any portion of a state highway by any motor vehicle unless the motor vehicle is equipped with the following: Tire chains or an alternate traction device; four-wheel drive with tires that have a tread depth of at least three sixteenths of an inch and that are adequate for the conditions; all-wheel drive with tires that have a tread depth of at least three sixteenths of an inch and that are adequate for the conditions; or tires that are imprinted by a manufacturer with a mountain-snowflake, "M&S", "M+S", or "M/S" symbol or that are all-weather rated by the manufacturer and that have a tread depth of at least three sixteenths of an inch.

A closure or restriction under this subsection (5) is effective when signs, including temporary or electronic signs, that notify the public of the closure or restriction are erected upon the highway, and the restriction in subsection (5)(a)(I)(B) of this section is effective on interstate 70 between milepost 133 (Dotsero) and milepost 259 (Morrison) from September 1 through May 31 of each year. It is unlawful to proceed when a state highway is closed or to proceed when a restriction is in effect without the equipment required by this subsection (5).

The Colorado state patrol shall cooperate with the department of transportation in the enforcement of a closing or restriction under this subsection (5).

The driver of a commercial vehicle with four or more drive wheels, other than a bus, shall affix tire chains to at least four of the drive wheel tires when the vehicle is required to be equipped with tire chains under this subsection (5). The driver of a bus shall affix tire chains to at least two of the drive wheel tires when the vehicle is required to be equipped with tire chains under this subsection (5).

A person who violates this subsection (5)(a)(I) commits a traffic infraction and is subject to the penalties in section 42-4-1701 (4)(a)(I)(F).

The transportation commission may promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this subsection (5).

As used in this subsection (5):

"Alternate traction device" means a device that is approved by the Colorado department of transportation as capable of providing traction comparable to that of metal chains or tire cables under similar conditions.

"Equipped" means that a motor vehicle uses or carries the appropriate traction equipment for icy or snow-packed conditions.

"Tire chains" means metal chains consisting of two circular metal loops, one on each side of the tire, connected by no fewer than nine evenly spaced chains across the tire tread.

The department of transportation and local authorities, within their respective jurisdictions, may, for the purpose of road construction and maintenance, temporarily close to through traffic or to all vehicular traffic any highway or portion thereof for a period not to exceed a specified number of workdays for project completion and shall, in conjunction with any such road closure, establish appropriate detours or provide for an alternative routing of the traffic affected when, in the opinion of said department or concerned local authorities, as evidenced by resolution or ordinance, such temporary closing of the highway or portion thereof and such rerouting of traffic is necessary for traffic safety and for the protection of work crews and road equipment. Such temporary closing of the highway or portion thereof and the routing of traffic along other roads shall not become effective until official traffic control devices are erected giving notice of the restrictions, and, when such devices are in place, no driver shall disobey the instructions or directions thereof.

Local authorities, within their respective jurisdictions, may provide for the temporary closing to vehicular traffic of any portion of a highway during a specified period of the day for the purpose of celebrations, parades, and special local events or civic functions when in the opinion of said authorities such temporary closing is necessary for the safety and protection of persons who are to use that portion of the highway during the temporary closing.

The department of transportation, local municipal authorities, and local county authorities shall enter into agreements with one another for the establishment, signing, and marking of appropriate detours and alternative routes which jointly affect state and local road systems and which are necessary to carry out the provisions of paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection (6). Any temporary closing of a street which is a state highway and any rerouting of state highway traffic shall have the approval of the department of transportation before such closing and rerouting becomes effective.

The transportation commission may also by resolution and within the reasonable exercise of the police power of the state adopt rules and regulations concerning the operation of any motor vehicle in any tunnel which is a part of the state highway system.

In promulgating such rules and regulations, the transportation commission shall consider the regulations of the public utilities commission and the United States department of transportation relating to the transportation of dangerous articles and may prohibit or regulate the operation of any motor vehicle which transports any article, deemed to be dangerous, in any tunnel which is a part of the state highway system.

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (8), a person who violates any provision of this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

A person who violates paragraph (a) of subsection (5) of this section while operating a commercial vehicle commits a class B traffic infraction and shall be punished as provided in section 42-4-1701 (4)(a)(I)(F); except that this paragraph (b) shall not apply to a tow operator who is towing a motor vehicle or traveling to a site from which a motor vehicle shall be towed.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2229, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 96:

(5) amended, p. 277, § 1, effective April 11.

L. 2002:

(5)(a)(II) amended, p. 96, § 1, effective March 26.

L. 2007:

(5)(a)(III), (5)(a)(IV), (5)(a)(V), (5)(a)(VI), and (5)(a)(VII) added and (8) amended, pp. 1332, 1333, §§ 1, 2, effective August 3.

L. 2014:

(4.5) added, (HB 14-1021), ch. 188, p. 702, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2019:

(5)(a)(I) amended and (5)(c) added, (HB 19-1207), ch. 202, p. 2171, § 1, effective August 2.

42-4-107. Obedience to police officers.

No person shall willfully fail or refuse to comply with any lawful order or direction of any police officer invested by law with authority to direct, control, or regulate traffic. Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class 2 misdemeanor traffic offense.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2230, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-105 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-107 was relocated to § 42-4-109.

Cross references:

For the penalty for a class 2 misdemeanor traffic offense, see § 42-4-1701 (3)(a)(II).

42-4-108. Public officers to obey provisions - exceptions for emergency vehicles.

The provisions of this article applicable to the drivers of vehicles upon the highways shall apply to the drivers of all vehicles owned or operated by the United States, this state, or any county, city, town, district, or other political subdivision of the state, subject to such specific exceptions as are set forth in this article with reference to authorized emergency vehicles.

The driver of an authorized emergency vehicle, when responding to an emergency call, or when in pursuit of an actual or suspected violator of the law, or when responding to but not upon returning from a fire alarm, may exercise the privileges set forth in this section, but subject to the conditions stated in this article. The driver of an authorized emergency vehicle may:

Park or stand, irrespective of the provisions of this title;

Proceed past a red or stop signal or stop sign, but only after slowing down as may be necessary for safe operation;

Exceed the lawful speeds set forth in section 42-4-1101 (2) or exceed the maximum lawful speed limits set forth in section 42-4-1101 (8) so long as said driver does not endanger life or property;

Disregard regulations governing directions of movement or turning in specified directions.

The exemptions and conditions provided in paragraphs (b) to (d), in their entirety, of subsection (2) of this section for an authorized emergency vehicle shall continue to apply to section 24-10-106 (1)(a), C.R.S., only when such vehicle is making use of audible or visual signals meeting the requirements of section 42-4-213, and the exemption granted in paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of this section shall apply only when such vehicle is making use of visual signals meeting the requirements of section 42-4-213 unless using such visual signals would cause an obstruction to the normal flow of traffic; except that an authorized emergency vehicle being operated as a police vehicle while in actual pursuit of a suspected violator of any provision of this title need not display or make use of audible or visual signals so long as such pursuit is being made to obtain verification of or evidence of the guilt of the suspected violator. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require an emergency vehicle to make use of audible signals when such vehicle is not moving, whether or not the vehicle is occupied.

The provisions of this section shall not relieve the driver of an authorized emergency vehicle from the duty to drive with due regard for the safety of all persons, nor shall such provisions protect the driver from the consequences of such driver's reckless disregard for the safety of others.

The state motor vehicle licensing agency shall designate any particular vehicle as an authorized emergency vehicle upon a finding that the designation of that vehicle is necessary to the preservation of life or property or to the execution of emergency governmental functions. Such designation shall be in writing, and the written designation shall be carried in the vehicle at all times, but failure to carry the written designation shall not affect the status of the vehicle as an authorized emergency vehicle.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2231, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 96:

(3) amended, p. 958, § 4, effective July 1.

42-4-109. Low-power scooters, animals, skis, skates, and toy vehicles on highways.

A person riding a low-power scooter upon a roadway where low-power scooter travel is permitted shall be granted all of the rights and shall be subject to all of the duties and penalties applicable to the driver of a vehicle as set forth in this article except those provisions of this article that, by their very nature, can have no application.

A person riding a low-power scooter shall not ride other than upon or astride a permanent and regular seat attached thereto.

No low-power scooter shall be used to carry more persons at one time than the number for which it is designed and equipped.

No person riding upon any low-power scooter, coaster, roller skates, sled, or toy vehicle shall attach the same or himself or herself to any vehicle upon a roadway.

A person operating a low-power scooter upon a roadway shall ride as close to the right side of the roadway as practicable, exercising due care when passing a standing vehicle or one proceeding in the same direction.

Persons riding low-power scooters upon a roadway shall not ride more than two abreast.

(6.5) A person under the age of eighteen years may not operate or carry a passenger who is under eighteen years of age on a low-power scooter unless the person and the passenger are wearing protective helmets in accordance with the provisions of section 42-4-1502 (4.5).

For the sake of uniformity and bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, electric scooter, and low-power scooter safety throughout the state, the department in cooperation with the department of transportation shall prepare and make available to all local jurisdictions for distribution to bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, electric scooter, and low-power scooter riders a digest of state regulations explaining and illustrating the rules of the road, equipment requirements, and traffic control devices that are applicable to the riders and their bicycles, electrical assisted bicycles, electric scooters, or low-power scooters. Local authorities may supplement this digest with a leaflet describing any additional regulations of a local nature that apply within their respective jurisdictions.

Persons riding or leading animals on or along any highway shall ride or lead such animals on the left side of said highway, facing approaching traffic. This shall not apply to persons driving herds of animals along highways.

No person shall use the highways for traveling on skis, toboggans, coasting sleds, skates, or similar devices. It is unlawful for any person to use any roadway of this state as a sled or ski course for the purpose of coasting on sleds, skis, or similar devices. It is also unlawful for any person upon roller skates or riding in or by means of any coaster, toy vehicle, or similar device to go upon any roadway except while crossing a highway in a crosswalk, and when so crossing such person shall be granted all of the rights and shall be subject to all of the duties applicable to pedestrians. This subsection (9) does not apply to any public way which is set aside by proper authority as a play street and which is adequately roped off or otherwise marked for such purpose.

Every person riding or leading an animal or driving any animal-drawn conveyance upon a roadway shall be granted all of the rights and shall be subject to all of the duties applicable to the driver of a vehicle by this article, except those provisions of this article which by their very nature can have no application.

Where suitable bike paths, horseback trails, or other trails have been established on the right-of-way or parallel to and within one-fourth mile of the right-of-way of heavily traveled streets and highways, the department of transportation may, subject to the provisions of section 43-2-135, by resolution or order entered in its minutes, and local authorities may, where suitable bike paths, horseback trails, or other trails have been established on the right-of-way or parallel to it within four hundred fifty feet of the right-of-way of heavily traveled streets, by ordinance, determine and designate, upon the basis of an engineering and traffic investigation, those heavily traveled streets and highways upon which shall be prohibited any bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, electric scooter, animal rider, animal-drawn conveyance, or other class or kind of nonmotorized traffic that is found to be incompatible with the normal and safe movement of traffic, and, upon such a determination, the department of transportation or local authority shall erect appropriate official signs giving notice of the prohibition; except that, with respect to controlled access highways, section 42-4-1010 (3) applies. When the official signs are erected, a person shall not violate any of the instructions contained on the official signs.

The parent of any child or guardian of any ward shall not authorize or knowingly permit any child or ward to violate any provision of this section.

Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (13), any person who violates a provision of this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

Any person who violates subsection (6.5) of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2232, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2007:

(6.5) added and (13) amended, p. 1481, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (6.5), (7), and (11) amended, (HB 09-1026), ch. 281, p. 1270, § 35, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

(7) and (11) amended, (HB 19-1221), ch. 271, p. 2558, § 3, effective May 23.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-107 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-109 was relocated to § 42-4-111.

Cross references:

For use of snowmobiles on highways, see §§ 33-14-110 to 33-14-112; for the penalty for a class B traffic infraction, see § 42-4-1701 (3)(a)(I).

42-4-109.5. Low-speed electric vehicles.

A low-speed electric vehicle may be operated only on a roadway that has a speed limit equal to or less than thirty-five miles per hour; except that it may be operated to directly cross a roadway that has a speed limit greater than thirty-five miles per hour at an at-grade crossing to continue traveling along a roadway with a speed limit equal to or less than thirty-five miles per hour.

Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), a low-speed electric vehicle may be operated on a state highway that has a speed limit equal to forty miles per hour or cross a roadway with a speed limit equal to forty miles per hour to cross at-grade, if:

Such roadway's lane width is eleven feet or greater;

Such roadway provides two or more lanes in either direction; and

The department determines, in consultation with local government and law enforcement, upon the basis of a traffic investigation, survey, appropriate design standards, or projected volumes, that the operation of a low-speed electric vehicle on the roadway poses no substantial safety risk or hazard to motorists, bicyclists, pedestrians, or other persons.

The department may waive the necessity of a traffic investigation or survey pursuant to section 42-4-1102 or may conduct a traffic investigation or survey to determine where low-speed electric vehicles can be driven safely on state highways or portions thereof. The department shall conduct this traffic investigation or survey using existing appropriations.

No person shall operate a low-speed electric vehicle on a limited-access highway.

Any person who violates subsection (1) or (2) of this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (SB 09-075), ch. 418, p. 2321, § 5, effective August 5, 2009.)

The Colorado department of transportation may regulate the operation of a low-speed electric vehicle on a state highway located outside of a municipality. The regulation shall take effect when the Colorado department of transportation places an appropriate sign that provides adequate notice of the regulation.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 394, § 7, effective August 6.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-075), ch. 418, p. 2321, § 5, effective August 5.

L. 2012:

(1) amended, (SB 12-013), ch. 148, p. 532, § 1, effective May 3.

42-4-109.6. Class B low-speed electric vehicles - effective date - rules.

A class B low-speed electric vehicle may be operated only on a roadway that has a speed limit equal to or less than forty-five miles per hour; except that it may be operated to directly cross a roadway that has a speed limit greater than forty-five miles per hour at an at-grade crossing to continue traveling along a roadway with a speed limit equal to or less than forty-five miles per hour.

No person shall operate a class B low-speed electric vehicle on a limited-access highway.

Any person who violates subsection (1) or (2) of this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

For the purposes of this section, "class B low-speed electric vehicle" means a low-speed electric vehicle that is capable of traveling at greater than twenty-five miles per hour but less than forty-five miles per hour.

The department of revenue shall not register or issue a title for a class B low-speed electric vehicle until after the United States department of transportation, through the national highway traffic safety administration, has adopted a federal motor vehicle safety standard for low-speed electric vehicles that authorizes operation at greater than twenty-five miles per hour but less than forty-five miles per hour.

After the United States department of transportation, through the national highway traffic safety administration, has adopted a federal motor vehicle safety standard for low-speed electric vehicles that authorizes operation at greater than twenty-five miles per hour but less than forty-five miles per hour, the department of revenue shall promulgate rules authorizing the operation of class B low-speed electric vehicles in compliance with this section and shall notify the revisor of statutes in writing. Upon the promulgation of rules authorizing the operation of such vehicles, subsections (1) to (3) of this section shall take effect.

The Colorado department of transportation may regulate the operation of a class B low-speed electric vehicle on a state highway located outside of a municipality. The regulation shall take effect when the Colorado department of transportation places an appropriate sign that provides adequate notice of the regulation.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire section added, (SB 09-075), ch. 418, p. 2322, § 6, effective August 5.

L. 2010:

(1) amended, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2125, § 186, effective August 11.

Editor's note:

As of publication date, the revisor of statutes has not received the notice referred to in subsection (5)(b).

42-4-110. Provisions uniform throughout state - legislative declaration.

The provisions of this article shall be applicable and uniform throughout this state and in all political subdivisions and municipalities therein. Cities and counties, incorporated cities and towns, and counties shall regulate and enforce all traffic and parking restrictions on streets which are state highways as provided in section 43-2-135 (1)(g), C.R.S., and all local authorities may enact and enforce traffic regulations on other roads and streets within their respective jurisdictions. All such regulations shall be subject to the following conditions and limitations:

All local authorities may enact, adopt, or enforce traffic regulations which cover the same subject matter as the various sections of this article and such additional regulations as are included in section 42-4-111, except as otherwise stated in paragraphs (c) to (e) of this subsection (1).

All local authorities may, in the manner prescribed in article 16 of title 31, C.R.S., or in article 15 of title 30, C.R.S., adopt by reference all or any part of a model traffic code which embodies the rules of the road and vehicle requirements set forth in this article and such additional regulations as are provided for in section 42-4-111; except that, in the case of state highways, any such additional regulations shall have the approval of the department of transportation.

No local authority shall adopt, enact, or enforce on any street which is a state highway any ordinance, rule, or resolution which alters or changes the meaning of any of the "rules of the road" or is otherwise in conflict with the provisions of this article. For the purpose of this section, the "rules of the road" shall be construed to mean any of the regulations on the operation of vehicles set forth in this article which drivers throughout the state are required to obey without the benefit or necessity of official traffic control devices as declared in section 42-4-603 (2).

In no event shall local authorities have the power to enact by ordinance regulations governing the driving of vehicles by persons under the influence of alcohol or of a controlled substance, as defined in section 18-18-102 (5), C.R.S., or under the influence of any other drug to a degree that renders any such person incapable of safely operating a vehicle, or whose ability to operate a vehicle is impaired by the consumption of alcohol or by the use of a controlled substance, as defined in section 18-18-102 (5), C.R.S., or any other drug, the registration of vehicles and the licensing of drivers, the duties and obligations of persons involved in traffic accidents, and vehicle equipment requirements in conflict with the provisions of this article; but said local authorities within their respective jurisdictions shall enforce the state laws pertaining to these subjects, and in every charge of violation the complaint shall specify the section of state law under which the charge is made and the state court having jurisdiction.

Pursuant to section 43-2-135 (1)(g), C.R.S., no regulation of a local authority shall apply to or become effective for any streets which are state highways, including any part of the national system of interstate and defense highways, until such regulation has been presented to and approved in writing by the department of transportation; except that such regulations shall become effective on such streets sixty days after receipt for review by the department of transportation if not disapproved in writing by said department during that sixty-day period.

The municipal courts have jurisdiction over violations of traffic regulations enacted or adopted by municipalities. However, the provisions of sections 42-4-1701, 42-4-1705, and 42-4-1707 shall not be applicable to municipalities.

No person convicted of or pleading guilty to a violation of a municipal traffic ordinance shall be charged or tried in a state court for the same or a similar offense.

Any municipality, city, county, or city and county located within the program area of the AIR program area as defined in section 42-4-304 may adopt ordinances or resolutions pertaining to the enforcement of the emissions control inspection requirements set forth in section 42-4-310.

An officer coming upon an unattended vehicle in the program area which is in apparent violation of an ordinance or resolution adopted as authorized in paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) may place upon such vehicle a penalty assessment notice indicating the offense and directing the owner or operator of such vehicle to remit the penalty assessment as set forth in such ordinance to the local jurisdiction in whose name the penalty assessment notice was issued.

The aggregate amount of fines, penalties, or forfeitures collected pursuant to ordinances or resolutions adopted as authorized in paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) shall be retained by the local jurisdiction in whose name such penalty notice was issued.

The general assembly declares that the adjudication of class A and class B traffic infractions through the county court magistrate system was not intended to create a conflict between the provisions of this article and municipal ordinances covering the same subject matter as this article nor was it intended to require or prohibit the decriminalization of municipal ordinances covering the same subject matter as this article. Municipalities may continue to enforce violations of such ordinances through municipal court even though similar state offenses are enforced through the magistrate system established under this article.

The general assembly hereby finds that the use of automated driving systems will help people who may have difficulty driving, including people who are elderly and people with disabilities, gain access to goods and services essential to daily life. This access requires traveling across and in multiple jurisdictions. Therefore, the regulation of automated driving systems is a matter of statewide concern.

A state agency or a political subdivision of the state shall not adopt or enforce a policy, rule, or ordinance that sets standards for an automated driving system that are different from the standards set for a human driver.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2233, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 99:

IP(1) and (1)(b) amended, p. 367, § 1, effective August 4.

L. 2002:

(2) amended, p. 1611, § 7, effective January 1, 2004.

L. 2012:

(1)(d) amended, (HB 12-1311), ch. 281, p. 1632, § 89, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

(6) added, (SB 17-213), ch. 277, p. 1517, § 3, effective August 9.

L. 2019:

(2) amended, (HB 19-1147), ch. 178, p. 2033, § 14, effective August 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-108 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-110 was relocated to § 42-4-112.

Cross references:

(1) For the penalty for class A and class B traffic infractions, see § 42-4-1701 (3)(a)(I).

(2) For the legislative declaration in SB 17-213, see section 1 of chapter 277, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.